Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1187.
do enact as follows:AB1187,11Section 1. 16.754 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 16.754 (2) (a) and 2amended to read:AB1187,2,7316.754 (2) (a) Notwithstanding s. 16.75 (1) (a) 2., (2), (2m), and (6), when all 4other factors are substantially equal making purchases, the state shall purchase 5materials which that are manufactured in the United States to the greatest extent 6in the United States, unless prohibited by federal law or a treaty or other 7international agreement.AB1187,28Section 2. 16.754 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB1187,2,13916.754 (2) (b) Each contract entered into by the state for the construction, 10repair, or modification of a public works or public improvement project shall contain 11a provision requiring the contractor to use materials that are manufactured in the 12United States in the performance of the contract, unless prohibited by federal law 13or a treaty or other international agreement.AB1187,314Section 3. 16.754 (3) (intro.) and (a) of the statutes are amended to read:AB1187,3,71516.754 (3) Exemptions. (intro.) Subsection (2) (a) does not apply if the 16materials are purchased for the purpose of commercial resale or for the purpose of 17use in the production of goods for commercial sale. Subsection (2) (a) does not apply 1to the purchase of stationery and printing materials. Subsection (2) does not apply 2if the department determines, under s. 16.75 (1) (a) 2., that the foreign nation or 3subdivision thereof in which the vendor is domiciled does not give preference to 4vendors domiciled in that nation or subdivision in making governmental purchases. 5Subsection (2) (a) does not apply if the department or other person having 6contracting authority in respect to the purchase determines that any of the 7following:AB1187,3,98(a) The materials are not manufactured in the United States in sufficient or 9reasonably available quantities; or.AB1187,410Section 4. 66.0901 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1187,3,141166.0901 (1m) (b) Except when necessary to secure federal aid and except as 12provided in sub. (10), a political subdivision may not use a bidding method that 13gives preference based on the geographic location of the bidder or that uses criteria 14other than the lowest responsible bidder in awarding a contract.AB1187,515Section 5. 66.0901 (10) of the statutes is created to read:AB1187,3,201666.0901 (10) Materials manufactured in the United States. Each public 17contract entered into by a municipality shall contain a provision that the contractor 18will use materials that are manufactured in the United States, as defined in s. 1916.754 (1) (b), in the performance of the contract, unless prohibited by federal law or 20a treaty or other international agreement.AB1187,3,2121